District of Columbia statutes.
34-214

“Public utility”, “utility” or “utility company” defined.

The term “public utility”, “utility” or “utility company” as used in this subtitle shall mean and embrace every street railroad, street railroad corporation, common carrier, gas plant, gas company, electric company, telephone corporation, telephone line, telegraph corporation, telegraph line, and pipeline company. Until the initial implementation date of Chapter 15 of this title, the term shall also include every electric generating facility owned and operated by the electric company. The term “public utility” excludes a person or entity that owns or operates electric vehicle supply equipment but does not sell or distribute electricity, an electric vehicle charging station service company, or an electric vehicle charging station service provider.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 974, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 201(b)(2), 47 DCR 1091
Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-227, § 17(a)(1), 51 DCR 10549
Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-252, § 101(b), 59 DCR 14932

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-1551.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-203.
1973 Ed., § 43-103.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-227 substituted “gas company” for “gas corporation”.
D.C. Law 13-107 inserted following “The term ‘public utility’ ” the words “or ‘utility’ or ‘utility company’ ”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-252 added the last sentence.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 7(a) of Prevention of Unauthorized Switching of Customer Natural Gas Accounts Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-13, July 10, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 6589).

Editor's Notes

Section 301 of D.C. Law 19-252 provided that the Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of the act within 180 days of its effective date [Mar. 19, 2013].